Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.13, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Reckless driving. (a) A person who drives a motor vehicle or light rail transit vehicle while aware of and consciously disregarding a substantial and unjustifiable risk that the driving may result in harm to another or another's property is guilty of reckless driving. The risk must be of such a nature and degree that disregard of it constitutes a significant deviation from the standard of conduct that a reasonable person would observe in the situation. (b) A person shall not race any vehicle upon any street or highway of this state. Any person who willfully compares or contests relative speeds by operating one or more vehicles is guilty of racing, which constitutes reckless driving, whether or not the speed contested or compared is in excess of the maximum speed prescribed by law. (c) A person who violates paragraph (a) or (b) is guilty of a misdemeanor. A person who violates paragraph (a) or (b) and causes great bodily harm or death to another is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.new text begin In addition to any other penalty imposed, a person who violates paragraph (b) must be fined: (1) not less than $300; (2) not less than $550 for a violation occurring within ten years of a prior violation; or (3) not less than $850 for a violation occurring within ten years of two or more prior violations.new text end (d) For purposes of this section, "great bodily harm" has the meaning given in section 609.02, subdivision 8. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to violations occurring on or after that date. new text end